Maine, session 132, LD688.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §807, sub-§3, ¶T, as amended by PL 2019, c. 597, §2, is further
amended to read:
T. A marine patrol officer who is not an attorney but is representing the Department
of Marine Resources in a libel proceeding before a District Court under Title 12, section
6207; or
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §807, sub-§3, ¶U, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 597, §3, is amended
to read:
U. Practice, pursuant to a rule of the Supreme Judicial Court, by a law student enrolled
in a law school accredited by the American Bar Association.; or
Sec. 3. 4 MRSA §807, sub-§3, ¶V is enacted to read:
V. A sworn law enforcement officer who is employed by the Department of the
Secretary of State who is not an attorney but is representing the State in a libel action
brought pursuant to Title 29-A, section 1113, subsection 15.